Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1252
Boat livery; vessel operated without required equipment; prohibited.

Neither the owner of a boat livery, nor his agent or employee shall permit any motorboat or any vessel designed or permitted by him to be operated as a motorboat to depart from his premises unless it shall have been provided, either by owner or renter, with the equipment required pursuant to sections 37-1232 to 37-1248 and any rules and regulations made pursuant thereto.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 52.